Missouri, session 2026, SB1199.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 1 and 324, RSMo, are amended by adding
thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 1.2030 and
324.018, to read as follows:
1.2030. 1. No funds shall be expended by any
department, division, or other entity of the state, or any
political subdivision for intradepartmental programs,
staffing, or other initiatives associated with "diversity,
equity, and inclusion" or "diversity, inclusion, and
belonging" or any other initiative that promotes:
(1) The preferential treatment of any individual or
group of individuals based on race, color, religion, sex,
gender, sexual orientation, ethnicity, national origin, or
ancestry;
(2) The concept that disparities between groups are
solely the result of oppression;
(3) Collective guilt ideologies;
(4) Intersectional or divisive identity activism; or
(5) The limiting of freedom of conscience, thought, or
speech.

SB 1199 2
2. The provisions of subsection 1 of this section
shall not prohibit any of the following:
(1) Following federal and state employment and
antidiscrimination laws; or
(2) Complying with the Americans with Disabilities
Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 12101, et seq.
3. No department, division, or other entity of the
state, or any political subdivision shall mandate, require,
or incentivize private sector employers to implement
programs or initiatives described in subsection 1 of this
section as a condition of awarding a state contract.
324.018. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "License", a license, certificate, registration,
permit, or accreditation that enables a person to legally
practice an occupation, profession, or activity in the state;
(2) "Oversight body", any board, department, agency,
or office of the state that issues licenses. The term
"oversight body" shall not include any political subdivision.
2. An oversight body shall not, as a condition of
receiving a license, require any person to receive training
or otherwise participate in any initiative associated with
"diversity, equity, and inclusion" or "diversity, inclusion,
and belonging" or any other initiative that promotes:
(1) The preferential treatment of any individual or
group of individuals based on race, color, religion, sex,
gender, sexual orientation, ethnicity, national origin, or
ancestry;
(2) The concept that disparities between groups are
solely the result of oppression;
(3) Collective guilt ideologies;
(4) Intersectional or divisive identity activism; or

SB 1199 3
(5) The limiting of freedom of conscience, thought, or
speech.
✓